Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.105

Forfeiture judgment vacated on defendant's production—When.

If a bond be given and execution stayed, as provided in RCW 10.19.100, and the person for whose appearance such recognizance was given shall be produced in court before the expiration of said period of sixty days, the judge may vacate such judgment upon such terms as may be just and equitable, otherwise execution shall forthwith issue as well against the sureties in the new bond as against the judgment debtors.

[ 1891 c 28 s 87; Code 1881 s 1139; 1867 p 103 s 3; RRS s 2233. Formerly RCW 10.19.100, part.]